Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2410
Importer, manufacturer, or dealer; sale or delivery; duties.

No importer, manufacturer, or dealer licensed pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 923 shall sell or deliver any handgun to another person other than a licensed importer, manufacturer, dealer, or collector until he or she has:

(1) Inspected a valid certificate issued to such person pursuant to sections 69-2401, 69-2403 to 69-2408, and 69-2409.01; and

(2) Inspected a valid identification containing a photograph of such person which appropriately and completely identifies such person.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1227, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 101.